src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON PL-NOM
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.NOM@+Pl+Nom0:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.NOM@%>%^WCnst   K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ACC@+Pl+Acc0:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ACC@%>%^WCnst   K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-PAR_A
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Pl+Par00:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>i%>AÄ1      K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Pl+Par+PxSg300:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>i%>AÄ1AÄ1      K_Num  ;

! kana:kano
LEXICON PL-PAR_A-LCns
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Pl+Par00:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>%^LCns%>i%>AÄ1      K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Pl+Par+PxSg30000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>%^LCns%>i%>AÄ1AÄ1      K_Num  ;


LEXICON PL-PAR_tA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Pl+Par000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>i%>tAÄ1      K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Pl+Par+PxSg3000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>i%>tAÄ1AÄ1      K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-PRL
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PRL@+Pl+Prl00000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.PRL@%>i%>%^WCnstse    K   ; ! rannoitse

LEXICON PL-TRA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** @
U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@+Pl+Tra0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@%>i%>%^WCnsks   K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@+Pl+Tra+PxSg2000000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@%>i%>%^WCnsksees   K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@+Pl+Tra+PxSg300000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@%>i%>%^WCnsksee   K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-ABE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABE@+Sg+Abe00:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABE@%>%^WCnstAÄ1    K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-ABL
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@+Sg+Abl00:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@%>%^WCnslt    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@+Sg+Abl+PxSg3000:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@%>%^WCnsltAÄ1AÄ1  K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-ADE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@+Sg+Ade00:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@%>%^WCnsV3l    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@+Sg+Ade0:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@%>%^WCnsl    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@+Sg+Ade+PxSg3000:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@%>%^WCnsllAÄ1AÄ1  K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-ALL
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@+Sg+All000:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@%>%^WCnslle    K_Num  ; 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@+Sg+All+PxSg3000:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@%>%^WCnsllee  K_Num  ; 

LEXICON SG-COM
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.COM@+Dial/Lauk+Sg+Com00:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    K_Num ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.COM@+Dial/Lauk+Sg+Com+PxSg30:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>%^LVwsnkAÄ1    K_Num ;

LEXICON SG-ELA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@+Sg+Ela00:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@%>%^WCnsst    K_Num ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@+Sg+Ela+PxSg3000:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@%>%^WCnsstAÄ1AÄ1    K_Num ;

LEXICON SG-ESS_Vn
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@+Sg+Ess00:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@%>%^LCnsV3n K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-ESS_nnA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@+Sg+Ess0:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@nnAÄ1    K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-EXE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.EXE@+Sg+Exe:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.EXE@nt    K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-GEN
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.GEN@+Sg+Gen0:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>%^WCnsn      K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ACC@+Sg+Acc0:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ACC@%>%^WCnsn      K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.GEN@+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>%^LVwsn      K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-ILL_sse
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Sg+Ill0:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@sse    K_Num   ;


LEXICON SG-ILL_V
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Sg+Ill:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>%^LCns%>V1    K_Num   ;

LEXICON SG-ILL_hV
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Sg+Ill0:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>hV1    K_Num   ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Sg+Ill+PxSg300:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>hV1%>V3    K_Num   ;

LEXICON SG-INE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.INE@+Sg+Ine00:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.INE@%>%^WCnsV3s    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.INE@+Sg+Ine0:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.INE@%>%^WCnss    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.INE@+Sg+Ine+PxSg3000:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.INE@%>%^WCnsssAÄ1AÄ1    K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-NOM
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.NOM@+Sg+Nom:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.NOM@    K_Num ;

LEXICON SG-PAR_A
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Sg+Par:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@AÄ1      K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-PAR_A-LCns@
U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Sg+Par0:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>%^LCnsAÄ1      K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-PAR_tA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Sg+Par:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@tAÄ1      K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Sg+Par+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.PAR@tAÄ1AÄ1      K_Num  ;

LEXICON SG-TRA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@+Sg+Tra00:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@%>%^WCnsks   K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@+Sg+Tra+PxSg20000:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@%>%^WCnsksees   K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@+Sg+Tra+PxSg3000:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.TRA@%>%^WCnsksee   K_Num  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
